Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.144

Relief from duty to register—Juvenile offenders.

(1) For a person who is not an adult, any existing legal obligation to register as a sex offender is extinguished on November 1, 2023, if the person no longer has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b).

(2) For a person who has an existing legal obligation to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b), the obligation shall extinguish two or three years after the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition according to the applicable registration period required under RCW 9A.44.140(4).

(3) By December 1, 2023, each registering agency shall conduct an individual review and remove all persons from the sex offender registry whose obligation to register is based on an offense committed while the person was under 18 years of age, unless the individual has a legal obligation to register under subsection (2) of this section.

[ 2023 c 150 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 150 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect November 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 150 s 12.]

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.